Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.065

Judges to ensure random selection—Description of process.

It shall be the duty of the judges of the superior court to ensure continued random selection of the master jury list and jury panels, which shall be done without regard to whether a person's name originally appeared on the list of registered voters, or on the list of licensed drivers and identicard holders, or both. The judges shall review the process from time to time and shall cause to be kept on file with the county clerk a description of the jury selection process. Any person who desires may inspect this description in said office.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring uniform equipment or method throughout the state, so long as fair and random selection of the master jury list and jury panels is achieved.

[ 1993 c 408 s 7; 1988 c 188 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1993 c 408: See notes following RCW 2.36.054.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.